Utah statutes.
53A-21-101.5.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "ADM" or "pupil in average daily membership" is as defined in Section 53A-17a-103.

(2)  "Base tax effort rate" means the average of:

(a)  the highest combined capital levy rate; and

(b)  the average combined capital levy rate for the school districts statewide.

(3)  "Combined capital levy rate" means a rate that includes the sum of the following property tax levies:

(a) (i)  the capital outlay levy authorized in Section 53A-16-107;

(ii)  the portion of the 10% of basic levy described in Section 53A-17a-145 that is budgeted for debt service or capital outlay;

(iii)  the debt service levy authorized in Section 11-14-310; and

(iv)  the voted capital outlay leeway authorized in Section 53A-16-110; or

(b) (i)  the capital local levy authorized in Section 53A-16-113; and

(ii)  the debt service levy authorized in Section 11-14-310.

(4)  "Derived net taxable value" means the quotient of:

(a)  the total property tax collections from April 1 through the following March 31 for a school district for the calendar year preceding the March 31 date; divided by

(b)  the school district's total tax rate for the calendar year preceding the March 31 referenced in Subsection (4)(a).

(5)  "Highest combined capital levy rate" means the highest combined capital levy rate imposed by a school district within the state for a fiscal year.

(6)  "Property tax base per ADM" means the quotient of:

(a)  a school district's derived net taxable value; divided by

(b)  the school district's ADM.

(7)  "Property tax yield per ADM" means:

(a)  the product of:

(i)  a school district's derived net taxable value; and

(ii)  the base tax effort rate; divided by

(b)  the school district's ADM.

(8)  "Statewide average property tax base per ADM" means the quotient of:

(a)  the sum of all school districts' derived net taxable value; divided by

(b)  the sum of all school districts' ADM.



Amended by Chapter 371, 2011 General Session

